pt-PT: Material da bobina: Cerâmica; Kanthal; Malha; Nicromo; Níquel; Aço inoxidável; Titânio; Outro
hr-HR: Materijal zavojnice: Keramika; Kanthal; Mrežica; Nikrom; Nikal; Nehrđajući čelik; Titanij; Ostalo
en: Coil material: Ceramic; Kanthal; Mesh; Nichrome; Nickel; Stainless steel; Titanium; Other
ko: 코일 소재: 세라믹; 칸탈; 메시; 니크롬; 니켈; 스테인리스 스틸; 티타늄; 기타
zh-CN: 线圈材质: 陶瓷; 康泰尔; 网状; 镍铬合金; 镍; 不锈钢; 钛; 其他
bg-BG: Материал на намотката: Керамика; Кантал; Мрежа; Нихром; Никел; Неръждаема стомана; Титан; Други
it: Materiale della bobina: Ceramica; Kanthal; Mesh; Nichel cromo; Nichel; Acciaio inossidabile; Titanio; Altro
sl-SI: Material tuljave: Keramika; Kanthal; Mrežica; Nikrom; Nikelj; Nerjavno jeklo; Titan; Drugo
da: Spolemateriale: Keramik; Kanthal; Mesh; Nikrom; Nikkel; Rustfrit stål; Titanium; Andet
ru: Материал катушки: Керамика; Кантал; Сетка; Нихром; Никель; Нержавеющая сталь; Титан; Другое
es: Material de la bobina: Cerámica; Kanthal; Malla; Nicromo; Níquel; Acero inoxidable; Titanio; Otro
vi: Chất liệu cuộn dây: Gốm; Kanthal; Lưới; Nichrome; Niken; Thép không gỉ; Titanium; Khác
nl: Spoelmateriaal: Keramiek; Kanthal; Mesh; Nichroom; Nikkel; Roestvrij staal; Titanium; Overig
el: Υλικό πηνίου: Κεραμικό; Kanthal; Mesh; Νιχρώμιο; Νικέλιο; Ανοξείδωτος χάλυβας; Τιτάνιο; Άλλο
ja: コイル素材: セラミック; カンタル; メッシュ; ニクロム; ニッケル; ステンレススチール; チタン; その他
cs: Materiál cívky: Keramika; Kanthal; Síťka (mesh); Nichrom; Nikl; Nerezová ocel; Titan; Jiný
zh-TW: 線圈材質: 陶瓷; 康泰爾合金; 網狀; 鎳鉻合金; 鎳; 不鏽鋼; 鈦金屬; 其他
fr: Matériau de la bobine: Céramique; Kanthal; Mesh; Nichrome; Nickel; Acier inoxydable; Titane; Autre
tr: Bobin malzemesi: Seramik; Kanthal; Mesh; Nikrom; Nikel; Paslanmaz çelik; Titanyum; Diğer
ro-RO: Materialul bobinei: Ceramică; Kanthal; Mesh; Nicrom; Nichel; Oțel inoxidabil; Titan; Altele
pl: Materiał cewki: Ceramika; Kanthal; Siatka (mesh); Nichrom; Nikiel; Stal nierdzewna; Tytan; Inny
de: Spulenmaterial: Keramik; Kanthal; Mesh; Nichrom; Nickel; Edelstahl; Titan; Andere
th: วัสดุของขดลวด: เซรามิก; กันทาล; ตาข่าย; นิโครม; นิกเกิล; สเตนเลสสตีล; ไทเทเนียม; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Materiál cievky: Keramika; Kanthal; Mesh (sieťka); Nichróm; Nikel; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Titán; Iné
nb: Materiale i coil: Keramikk; Kanthal; Mesh; Nikrom; Nikkel; Rustfritt stål; Titan; Annet
fi: Vastuksen materiaali: Keraaminen; Kanthal; Mesh; Nikromi; Nikkeli; Ruostumaton teräs; Titaani; Muu
hu: Tekercs anyaga: Kerámia; Kanthal; Mesh; Nikróm; Nikkel; Rozsdamentes acél; Titán; Egyéb
sv: Rullens material: Keramik; Kanthal; Mesh; Nichrome; Nickel; Rostfritt stål; Titan; Övrigt
lt-LT: Ritės medžiaga: Keramika; Kantalis; Tinklelis („Mesh“); Nichromas; Nikelis; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Titanas; Kita
pt-BR: Material da bobina: Cerâmica; Kanthal; Mesh; Nicromo; Níquel; Aço inoxidável; Titânio; Outros